New York, session 2025-2026, A6462.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2599-bbb to read as follows: 3 § 2599-bbb. Buffer zones. 1. Every reproductive health care facility 4 offering abortion care shall maintain a one hundred foot buffer zone 5 around any entrance to such clinic to allow patients to enter such clin- 6 ics without harassment. 7 2. For the purposes of this section, "harassment" shall mean: 8 (a) To knowingly physically obstruct or block another person from 9 entering into or exiting from the premises of a reproductive health care 10 facility by physically striking, shoving, restraining, grabbing, or 11 otherwise subjecting a person to unwanted physical contact, or attempt- 12 ing to do the same; 13 (b) To knowingly obstruct or block the premises of a reproductive 14 health care facility, so as to impede access to or from the facility, or 15 to attempt to do the same; 16 (c) To follow another person within one hundred feet of the premises 17 of a reproductive health care facility; 18 (d) To engage in a course of conduct or repeatedly commit acts within 19 one hundred feet of the premises of a reproductive health care facility 20 when such behavior places another person in reasonable fear of physical 21 harm, or to attempt to do the same; 22 (e) To physically damage a reproductive health care facility so as to 23 interfere with its operation, or to attempt to do the same; or 24 (f) To knowingly interfere with the operation of a reproductive health 25 care facility, or to attempt to do the same, by activities that include, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06388-01-5 A. 6462 2 1 but are not limited to, interfering with, or attempting to interfere 2 with (i) medical procedures being performed at such facility or (ii) the 3 delivery of goods to such facility. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.